Arkansas, session 2025, HB1614.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 25-1-111 is amended to read as follows:
25-1-111. Designation related to certain criminal justice grant
programs — Grant Advisory Board — Definition.
(a) The Governor shall have the authority to designate the state
agency responsible for the administration and disbursement of funds received
by the State of Arkansas under the Victims of Crime Act of 1984, 34 U.S.C. §§
20101 — 20111, the Violence Against Women Act of 1994, Pub. L. No. 103-322,
and the Family Violence Prevention and Services Act, 42 U.S.C. § 10401 et
seq., and the sexual assault services program, 34 U.S.C. § 12511, in the
manner authorized by federal law.
(b) The state agency designated by the Governor under this section
shall not disburse Victims of Crime Act grant program, STOP Violence Against
Women Act grant program, or Family Violence Prevention and Services Act grant
program funds, or sexual assault services program funds without providing an
opportunity for subgrantee qualification selection assistance and
programmatic support by the Arkansas Child Abuse/Rape/Domestic Violence
*LGL104*
03-12-2025 14:03:47 LGL104

As Engrossed: S3/12/25 HB1614
Commission and the Grant Advisory Board.
(c)(1) The Grant Advisory Board is established under this section to
assist potential beneficiaries of the Victims of Crime Act grant program,
STOP Violence Against Women Act grant program, or Family Violence Prevention
and Services Act grant program funds, or sexual assault services program
funds by:
(A)(i) Providing review and advice concerning grant
processes and grant funding.
(ii) If a member of the Grant Advisory Board has a
financial interest in an organization seeking grant funding under subdivision
(c)(1)(A)(i) of this section, the member may participate in discussion
regarding the award of the grant, but the member shall not vote on the
matter;
(B) Hearing grievances from the beneficiaries of those
funds; and
(C) After Grant Advisory Board review, requiring the state
agency to provide timely notification to the Grant Advisory Board of any
revisions to existing rules and any proposed rules to be promulgated, within
federal guidelines, by the state agency designated by the Governor under this
section, concerning the Victims of Crime Act grant program, STOP Violence
Against Women Act grant program, or Family Violence Prevention and Services
Act grant program funds, or sexual assault services program funds, and any
applicable policies and procedures.
(2) The Grant Advisory Board shall consist of:
(A) Two (2) representatives selected by the Arkansas
Coalition Against Sexual Assault;
(B) Two (2) representatives selected by the Arkansas
Coalition Against Domestic Violence;
(C) Two (2) representatives selected by the Arkansas State
CASA Association;
(D) Two (2) representatives selected by the Prosecution
Coordination Commission;
(E) One (1) representative selected by the Criminal
Justice Institute Advisory Board for Law Enforcement Management Training and
Education; and
(F) One (1) representative selected by the Arkansas Child
03-12-2025 14:03:47 LGL104

As Engrossed: S3/12/25 HB1614
Abuse/Rape/Domestic Violence Commission; and
(G) One (1) representative each from any other advisory
body determined to be necessary by the state administrative agency, including
without limitation, the elderly, non-English-speaking residents, disabled
persons, members of racial or ethnic minorities, and residents of rural or
remote areas.
(d) The state agency designated by the Governor under this section
shall not disburse Victims of Crime Act grant program funds without providing
an opportunity for review of and advice concerning grant processes and grant
funding by the Grant Advisory Board.
(e)(1) The state agency designated by the Governor under this section
shall not disburse funds under the law enforcement, prosecution, and
judiciary percentages of the STOP Violence Against Women Act grant program,
without providing an opportunity for review of and advice concerning grant
processes and grant funding by the Grant Advisory Board.
(2) The state agency designated by the Governor under this
section shall not disburse funds under the victims services and discretionary
percentages of the STOP Violence Against Women Act grant program without
providing an opportunity for review of and advice concerning grant processes
and grant funding by the Grant Advisory Board.
(f) The state agency designated by the Governor under this section
shall not disburse Family Violence Prevention and Services Act grant program
funds without providing an opportunity for review of and advice concerning
grant processes and grant funding by the Grant Advisory Board.
(g) The state agency designated by the Governor under this section
shall not disburse sexual assault services program funds without providing an
opportunity for review of and advice concerning grant processes and grant
funding by the Grant Advisory Board.
(h) The state agency designated by the Governor under this section
shall, after the review and recommendations of the Grant Advisory Board,
promulgate rules consistent with federal law setting forth the policies and
procedures for the administration and disbursement of Victims of Crime Act
grant program, STOP Violence Against Women Act grant program, and Family
Violence Prevention and Services Act grant program funds, and sexual assault
services program funds, including policies and procedures for the
participation and assistance of advisory bodies established to assist
03-12-2025 14:03:47 LGL104

As Engrossed: S3/12/25 HB1614
potential beneficiaries of those funds.
(h)(1)(i) The Grant Advisory Board shall prepare and submit a written
report annually to the House Committee on State Agencies and Governmental
Affairs and the Senate Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs
that includes:
(1) The status of the administration and disbursement of funds
received by the state, in a manner authorized by federal law, under the:
(A) Victims of Crime Act of 1984, 34 U.S.C. §§ 20101 -
20111;
(B) Violence Against Women Act of 1994, Pub L. No. 103 -
322;
(C) Family Violence Prevention and Services Act, 42 U.S.C.
§ 10401 et seq.; and
(D) Sexual assault services program, 34 U.S.C. § 12511;
and
(2) The status of funding levels for support and continuity of
victim services programs.
(j)(1) As used in this section, “review” means an analysis,
evaluation, assessment, appraisal, inquiry, inspection, or a study.
(2) “Review” does not mean the authority utilized by the General
Assembly in its analysis of proposed rules or appropriations.

/s/Lundstrum













03-12-2025 14:03:47 LGL104